Illinois, session 104th, SB2754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-101-3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-101-3)7    Sec. 11-101-3. Noise mitigation; air quality.8    (a) A municipality that has implemented a Residential 9Sound Insulation Program to mitigate aircraft noise shall 10perform indoor air quality monitoring and laboratory analysis 11of windows and doors installed pursuant to the Residential 12Sound Insulation Program to determine whether there are any 13adverse health impacts associated with off-gassing from such 14windows and doors. Such monitoring and analysis shall be 15consistent with applicable professional and industry 16standards. The municipality shall make any final reports 17resulting from such monitoring and analysis available to the 18public on the municipality's website. The municipality shall 19develop a science-based mitigation plan to address significant 20health-related impacts, if any, associated with such windows 21and doors as determined by the results of the monitoring and 22analysis. In a municipality that has implemented a Residential 23Sound Insulation Program to mitigate aircraft noise, if   SB2754- 2 -LRB104 16560 RTM 29958 b1requested by the homeowner pursuant to a process established 2by the municipality, which process shall include, at a 3minimum, notification in a newspaper of general circulation 4and a mailer sent to every address identified as a recipient of 5windows and doors installed under the Residential Sound 6Insulation Program, the municipality shall replace all windows 7and doors installed under the Residential Sound Insulation 8Program in such homes where one or more windows or doors have 9been found to have caused offensive odors, including in homes 10where defective products were found to have caused offensive 11odors prior to the initiation of the Residential Sound 12Insulation Program. However, airport revenue funds shall not 13be used to replace any windows or doors in homes where later 14testing done as part of the Residential Sound Insulation 15Program found no offensive odor. Subject to appropriation, the 16municipality shall replace windows and doors in at least 750 17residences a year. Residents who altered or modified a 18replacement window or accepted a replacement screen for the 19window shall not be disqualified from compensation or future 20services. Only those homeowners who request that the 21municipality perform an odor inspection as prescribed by the 22process established by the municipality within 6 months of 23notification being published and mailers being sent shall be 24eligible for odorous window and odorous door replacement. 25Residents who are eligible to receive replacement windows 26shall be allowed to choose the color and type of replacement   SB2754- 3 -LRB104 16560 RTM 29958 b1window. For purposes of aiding in the selection of such 2replacement windows, a showcase and display of available 3replacement window types shall be established and located at 4Chicago Midway International Airport. Homes that have been 5identified by the municipality as having odorous windows or 6doors are not required to make said request to the 7municipality. The right to make a claim for replacement and 8have it considered pursuant to this Section shall not be 9affected by the fact of odor-related claims made or 10odor-related products received pursuant to the Residential 11Sound Insulation Program prior to June 5, 2019 (the effective 12date of this Section). The municipality shall also perform 13in-home air quality testing in residences in which windows and 14doors are replaced under this Section. In order to receive 15in-home air quality testing, a homeowner must request such 16testing from the municipality, and the total number of homes 17tested in any given year shall not exceed 25% of the total 18number of homes in which windows and doors were replaced under 19this Section in the prior calendar year. 20    (b) An advisory committee shall be formed, composed of the 21following: (i) 2 members of the municipality who reside in 22homes that have received windows or doors pursuant to the 23Residential Sound Insulation Program and have been identified 24by the municipality as having odorous windows or doors, 25appointed by the Secretary of Transportation; (ii) one 26employee of the Aeronautics Division of the Department of   SB2754- 4 -LRB104 16560 RTM 29958 b1Transportation who shall only cast votes when breaking a tie; 2(iii) 2 employees of the municipality that implemented the 3Residential Sound Insulation Program in question; and (iv) 2 4members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 5Representatives, 2 members appointed by the President of the 6Senate, one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 7House of Representatives, and one member appointed by the 8Minority Leader of the Senate. The advisory committee shall 9determine by majority vote which homes contain windows or 10doors that cause offensive odors and thus are eligible for 11replacement, shall promulgate a list of such homes, and shall 12develop recommendations as to the order in which homes are to 13receive window replacement. The recommendations shall include 14reasonable and objective criteria for determining which 15windows or doors are odorous, consideration of the date of 16odor confirmation for prioritization, severity of odor, 17geography and individual hardship, and shall provide such 18recommendations to the municipality. The advisory committee 19shall develop a process in which homeowners can demonstrate 20extreme hardship. As used in this subsection, "extreme 21hardship" means: liquid infiltration of the window or door; 22health and medical condition of the resident; and residents 23with sensitivities related to smell. At least 10% of the homes 24receiving a replacement in a year shall be homes that have 25demonstrated extreme hardship. The advisory committee shall 26compile a report demonstrating: (i) the number of homes in   SB2754- 5 -LRB104 16560 RTM 29958 b1line to receive a replacement; (ii) the number of homes that 2received replacement windows or doors, or both; (iii) the 3number of homes that received financial compensation instead 4of a replacement; and (iv) the number of homes with confirmed 5mechanical issues. Until December 31, 2022, the report shall 6be compiled monthly, after December 31, 2022, the report shall 7be complied quarterly. The advisory committee shall accept all 8public questions and furnish a written response within 2 9business days. The advisory committee shall comply with the 10requirements of the Open Meetings Act. The Chicago Department 11of Aviation shall provide administrative support to the 12committee. The municipality shall consider the recommendations 13of the committee but shall retain final decision-making 14authority over replacement of windows and doors installed 15under the Residential Sound Insulation Program, and shall 16comply with all federal, State, and local laws involving 17procurement. A municipality administering claims pursuant to 18this Section shall provide to every address identified as 19having submitted a valid claim under this Section a quarterly 20report setting forth the municipality's activities undertaken 21pursuant to this Section for that quarter. However, the 22municipality shall replace windows and doors pursuant to this 23Section only if, and to the extent, grants are distributed to, 24and received by, the municipality from the Sound-Reducing 25Windows and Doors Replacement Fund for the costs associated 26with the replacement of sound-reducing windows and doors   SB2754- 6 -LRB104 16560 RTM 29958 b1installed under the Residential Sound Insulation Program 2pursuant to Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance Act. In 3addition, the municipality shall revise its specifications for 4procurement of windows for the Residential Sound Insulation 5Program to address potential off-gassing from such windows in 6future phases of the program. A municipality subject to the 7Section shall not legislate or otherwise regulate with regard 8to indoor air quality monitoring, laboratory analysis or 9replacement requirements, except as provided in this Section, 10but the foregoing restriction shall not limit said 11municipality's taxing power.12    (c) A home rule unit may not regulate indoor air quality 13monitoring and laboratory analysis, and related mitigation and 14mitigation plans, in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 15This Section is a limitation of home rule powers and functions 16under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 17Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 18units of powers and functions exercised by the State.19    (d) This Section shall not be construed to create a 20private right of action.21(Source: P.A. 103-200, eff. 6-30-23; 104-404, eff. 8-15-25.)